Illinois, session 104th, SB204.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Circuit Courts Act is amended by changing 5Section 2f-14 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 35/2f-14)7    Sec. 2f-14. 6th judicial circuit; resident judgeships.8    (a) The at-large judgeships of the 6th judicial circuit 9existing on January 7, 2022 shall be converted to resident 10judgeships as provided in this subsection as those judgeships 11are or become vacant. The first 3 that become vacant after 12January 7, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 102-693) 13shall be converted to resident judgeships elected from 14Champaign County. The remaining two at-large judgeships that 15become vacant shall be converted to resident judgeships 16elected from Macon County. Thereafter, persons elected to 17those resident judgeships shall be residents of the county 18which elects them.19    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly not to create 20any additional judgeships in the 6th judicial circuit by 21Public Act 102-693 and this amendatory Act of the 102nd 22General Assembly. Notwithstanding any other provision of law 23to the contrary, the conversion of at-large judgeships to   SB0204- 2 -LRB104 03748 JRC 13772 b1resident judgeships under subsection (a) of this Section shall 2not entitle the 6th judicial circuit to any additional circuit 3judgeships elected at-large.4(Source: P.A. 102-693, eff. 1-7-22; 102-1126, eff. 2-10-23.)